Indiana, session 2026, SB183.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3-2-29.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 29.5. (a) This section applies to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "health insurance plan" means a
policy, contract, certificate, or agreement offered or issued:
(1) by an entity that assumes or carries insurance risk; and
(2) to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse the
costs of health care services, including dental and vision
services.
(c) As used in this section, "taxpayer" means:
(1) an individual filing a single return;
(2) a married couple filing a joint return; or
(3) a married individual filing a separate return.
(d) Each taxable year, a taxpayer who is covered by a health
insurance plan may deduct from the taxpayer's adjusted gross
income an amount equal to the total amount of premiums on the
2026 IN 183—LS 6613/DI 129


health insurance plan the taxpayer paid for coverage during the
taxable year.
(e) In the case of a married individual filing a separate return,
the amount of the deduction for each spouse is equal to fifty
percent (50%) of the total amount of premiums allowed to be
deducted under subsection (d).
2026 IN 183—LS 6613/DI 129